src/fst/affixes/VTA_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_Regular_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+1Sg:igosiiwaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Pl:igosiiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Sg:igosiiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+Excl:igosiiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+Incl:igosiiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl:isinowagoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg:isiinowaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiiwagwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiwaawagwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwagen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawagen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiiwagen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiwaawagen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg:isiiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiiwegwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwaawegwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiiwaaweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwaawegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl:isiiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg:isiiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiiwadwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiwaawadwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwaden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawaden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiiwaden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiwaawaden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl:isiiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg:isiiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl:igoosiiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg:isiinowegwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl:isiiwangidwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl:isiinowangwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg:isiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl:igoosiiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg:isiinowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl:isiiwangiden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl:isiinowangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl:isiinogwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg:isiinogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aasiiwangidwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaawangidwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwangiden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawangiden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aasiiwangiden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaawangiden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aasiiwangwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwaawangwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aasiiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwaawangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg:igoosiiwaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl:igoosiiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg:igoosiiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx:aasiiwintwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx:aasiwaawindwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwinden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaawinden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx:aasiiwinden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx:aasiwaawinden # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl:igoosiiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl:igoosiiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+1Sg:igosiwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Pl:igosiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Sg:igosiwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+3PlProx:igosigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgProx:igosig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+Excl:igosiwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+Incl:igosiwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl:isinowagog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg:isinowaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiwagwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwag # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiwag # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg:isiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwegwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl:isiwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg:isiwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiwadwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwad # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiwad # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl:isiwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg:isigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl:isinowegwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg:isinokwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl:isiwangidwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl:isinowangwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg:isig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl:isinoweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg:isinok # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl:isiwangid # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl:isinowang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl:igosiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg:igoosiwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwangidwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwangid # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwangid # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwangwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg:igoosiwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl:igoosiweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg:igoosiwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx:aasiwindwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwind # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx:aasiwind # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl:igoosiwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl:igoosiwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+1Sg:igosiwaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Pl:igosiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Sg:igosiwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+3PlProx:igosigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosinigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgProx:igosigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+Excl:igosiwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+Incl:igosiwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl:isinowagoogoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg:isinowaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiwagwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwagiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiwagiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg:isiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx:aasiwegwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx:aasiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl:isiwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg:isiwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx:aasiwadwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwadiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx:aasiwadiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl:isiwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg:isigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl:igoosiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg:isinowegwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl:isiwangidwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl:isinowangwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg:isigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl:igoosiwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg:isinowegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl:isiwangidiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl:isinowangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl:isinokwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg:isinokiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwangidwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwangidiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx:angidiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx:aasiwangwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx:aasiwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg:igoosiwaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl:igoosiwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg:igoosiwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx:aasiwindwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwindiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx:aasiwindiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl:igoosiwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl:igoosiwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+1Sg:igowaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Pl:igowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Sg:igowanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+3PlProx:igowaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgProx:igogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+Excl:igowaangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0Sg/%0Pl+Incl:igowangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl:inagoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg:inowaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aawagwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawagen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aawagen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg:iwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx:aawegwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx:aawegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl:iwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg:iwanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx:aawadwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawaden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx:aawaden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl:iwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg:iwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl:igoowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg:inowegwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl:iwangidwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl:inowangwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg:igwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl:igoowanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg:inowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl:iwangiden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl:inowangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl:inogwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg:inogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aawangidwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawangiden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aawangiden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx:aawangwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx:aawangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg:igoowaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl:igoowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg:igoowanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx:aawindwaawen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawinden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx:aawinden # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl:igoowaangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl:igoowangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+1Sg:igoyaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Pl:igoyeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Sg:igoyan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+3PlProx:igowaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgProx:igod # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+Excl:igoyaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0Sg/%0Pl+Incl:igoyang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl:inagog # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg:inaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx:agwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imag # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx:ag # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg:iyeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx:egwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx:eg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl:iyaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg:iyan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx:adwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx:ad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl:iyaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg:iwaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl:inegwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg:ikwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl:iyangidwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl:inangwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igod # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg:id # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl:ineg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg:ik # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl:iyangid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl:inang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl:igooyeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg:igooyan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx:angidwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imangid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx:angid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx:angwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx:ang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg:igooyaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl:igooyeg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg:igooyan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx:indwaa # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imind # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx:ind # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl:igooyaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl:igooyang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+1Sg:igoyaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Pl:igoyegiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+2Sg:igoyamban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+3PlProx:igowaapan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0Sg/%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonipan # ;
